Missouri, session 2026, SB1457.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 461, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 461.900, to read as
follows:
461.900. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Beneficiary designation", a provision in an
instrument designating a beneficiary, other than in a will
or an instrument creating a trust, and may also mean the
instrument itself including, but not limited to, the
following:
(a) An annuity or insurance policy;
(b) An account with a designation for payment on death;
(c) A security registered in beneficiary form;
(d) A pension, profit-sharing, retirement, or other
employment-related benefit plan; and
(e) Any other nonprobate transfer at death;
(2) "Charitable organization", an organization with a
charitable purpose that does business in this state or holds
property in this state and is described in Section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as being

SB 1457 2
exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(3) "Charitable purpose", a purpose described in
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, or a benevolent, educational, philanthropic,
humane, scientific, patriotic, social welfare or advocacy,
public health, environmental conservation, civic, or other
eleemosynary objective.
2. If a charitable organization is a beneficiary of an
interest in property created by beneficiary designation, the
charitable organization may present an affidavit to the
holder of the property or to any person with information
about the property for the purpose of obtaining the property
or information regarding the property. The affidavit shall
state the following:
(1) The decedent's name and last known address;
(2) A general description of the property to the
extent known;
(3) The charitable organization's name, address, and
primary contact information;
(4) That the charitable organization is a charitable
organization as defined in this section;
(5) A request that the property be paid or transferred
to the charitable organization or that information about the
property be given to the charitable organization;
(6) That no one other than the charitable organization
has a right to the interest in the property listed in the
affidavit;
(7) That the affidavit has been signed by a duly
authorized representative of the charitable organization
under penalty of perjury before a notary public as provided
in chapter 486; and

SB 1457 3
(8) That the information in the affidavit is true and
correct.
3. The affidavit shall be accompanied by the following:
(1) A copy of the charitable organization's
determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service
recognizing its tax-exempt status;
(2) A copy of the charitable organization's
certificate of good standing issued by the secretary of
state as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign
corporation is in good standing;
(3) A statement that on information or belief of the
affiant, the property owner is deceased supported by a death
certificate of the decedent, or probate notice published by
the personal representative of the decedent's estate, or
proof of payment of the decedent's funeral expenses, or the
decedent's obituary as verification of the decedent's death;
(4) A corporate resolution or similar statement of
authority of the affiant to act on behalf of the charitable
organization; and
(5) Federal Internal Revenue Service Form W-9
completed by an authorized representative of the charitable
organization.
4. The holder of the property shall not request any
additional personal information from any individual employed
by or serving on the board of the charitable organization
including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Social security number or driver's license number;
(2) Contact information; or
(3) Personal financial information.
5. If the requirements of subsections 3 and 4 of this
section are satisfied, the following apply:

SB 1457 4
(1) The decedent's property shall be paid, delivered,
or transferred to or for the benefit of the charitable
organization if the affidavit has requested the transfer of
ownership of the property to the charitable organization;
(2) A transfer agent of a security described in the
affidavit shall change registered ownership on the books of
the corporation from the decedent to or for the benefit of
the charitable organization if the affidavit has requested
the transfer of ownership of the property to the charitable
organization; and
(3) The information requested in the affidavit shall
be delivered to the charitable organization.
6. The holder of the property and any person who in
good faith delivers the property or information requested in
reliance on information a charitable organization provides
under this section, who has no knowledge that
representations contained in the affidavit are incorrect,
shall not be liable to any person for so acting and may
assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained
100 in the affidavit. The time to verify a charitable
101 organization's authority shall not exceed thirty days from
102 the date of delivery of the affidavit. Any right or title
103 acquired from the charitable organization in consideration
104 of the provision of property or information under this
105 section is not invalid in consequence of misapplication by
106 the charitable organization. A transaction or a lien
107 created by a transaction entered into by the charitable
108 organization and anyone acting in reliance on the affidavit
109 under this section shall be enforceable against the property
110 the charitable organization has requested.
111 7. If the holder of the property refuses to provide
112 the requested property or information within thirty days

SB 1457 5
113 after receiving the affidavit, the charitable organization
114 may bring an action against the holder of the property to
115 recover the property or receive the information or to compel
116 the delivery of the property. An action brought under this
117 section shall be brought within one year after the date of
118 the act or failure to act. If the court finds that the
119 holder of the property acted unreasonably in failing to
120 deliver the property or information as requested in the
121 affidavit, the court may award to the charitable
122 organization any or all of the following:
123 (1) Damages sustained by the charitable organization;
124 (2) Costs of the action;
125 (3) A penalty in an amount determined by the court
126 between five hundred dollars and ten thousand dollars; and
127 (4) Reasonable attorney's fees based on the value of
128 the time reasonably expended by the charitable
129 organization's attorney and not by the amount of the
130 recovery on behalf of the charitable organization.
✓